ja: 燃料系連携タイプ: バンジョー継手; ホースバーブ; クイックコネクト (SAE); クイックコネクト (メートル); シュレーダーバルブ; サイドフィードインジェクターアダプター; トップフィードインジェクターアダプター; ユニバーサルコーンアダプター; その他
zh-TW: 燃油系統連接類型: 班卓接頭; 軟管倒刺; 快速接頭 (SAE); 快速接頭 (公制); 美式氣門嘴; 側饋噴油嘴轉接器; 頂饋噴油嘴轉接器; 通用錐形轉接器; 其他
lt-LT: Kuro sistemos jungties tipas: „Banjo“ tipo jungtis; Žarnos „eglutė“; Greito sujungimo (SAE); Greito sujungimo (metrinė); „Schrader“ vožtuvas; Šoninio padavimo purkštuko adapteris; Viršutinio padavimo purkštuko adapteris; Universalus kūginis adapteris; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta povezave sistema za gorivo: Banjo priključek; Rebrasti priključek; Hitri priključek (SAE); Hitri priključek (metrični); Schraderjev ventil; Adapter injektorja s stranskim napajanjem; Adapter injektorja z zgornjim napajanjem; Univerzalni konični adapter; Drugo
en: Fuel system connection type: Banjo fitting; Hose barb; Quick-connect (SAE); Quick-connect (metric); Schrader valve; Side-feed injector adapter; Top-feed injector adapter; Universal cone adapter; Other
sv: Bränslesystemkopplingstyp: Banjokoppling; Slangnippel; Snabbkoppling (SAE); Snabbkoppling (metrisk); Schraderventil; Adapter för sidmatad spridare; Adapter för toppmatad spridare; Universell konadapter; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de ligação do sistema de combustível: Encaixe banjo; Espigão de mangueira; Engate rápido (SAE); Engate rápido (métrico); Válvula Schrader; Adaptador de injetor de alimentação lateral; Adaptador de injetor de alimentação superior; Adaptador de cone universal; Outro
da: Brændstofsystemets tilslutningstype: Banjo-fitting; Slangestuds; Quick-connect (SAE); Quick-connect (metrisk); Schrader-ventil; Adapter til side-feed-injektor; Adapter til top-feed-injektor; Universel kegleadapter; Andet
fi: Polttoainejärjestelmän liitäntätyyppi: Banjoliitin; Letkukara; Pikaliitin (SAE); Pikaliitin (metrinen); Schrader-venttiili; Sivusyöttösuuttimen adapteri; Päältäsyöttösuuttimen adapteri; Yleismallinen kartioadapteri; Muu
it: Sistema di alimentazione tipo Rap: Raccordo banjo; Portagomma; Attacco rapido (SAE); Attacco rapido (metrico); Valvola Schrader; Adattatore per iniettore ad alimentazione laterale; Adattatore per iniettore ad alimentazione dall’alto; Adattatore a cono universale; Altro
tr: Yakıt sistemi bağlantı tipi: Banjo bağlantı elemanı; Hortum ucu; Hızlı bağlantı (SAE); Hızlı bağlantı (metrik); Schrader valfi; Yandan beslemeli enjektör adaptörü; Üstten beslemeli enjektör adaptörü; Evrensel konik adaptör; Diğer
ro-RO: Tipul de conexiune al sistemului de alimentare: Racord banjo; Ștuț pentru furtun; Conectare rapidă (SAE); Conectare rapidă (metric); Supapă Schrader; Adaptor pentru injector cu alimentare laterală; Adaptor pentru injector cu alimentare superioară; Adaptor conic universal; Altele
el: Τύπος σύνδεσης συστήματος καυσίμου: Εξάρτημα banjo; Ακροφύσιο σωλήνα; Ταχυσύνδεσμος (SAE); Ταχυσύνδεσμος (μετρικός); Βαλβίδα Schrader; Προσαρμογέας μπεκ πλευρικής τροφοδοσίας; Προσαρμογέας μπεκ άνω τροφοδοσίας; Προσαρμογέας γενικής χρήσης με κώνο; Άλλο
hu: Üzemanyagrendszer csatlakozó típusa: Banjo csatlakozó; Tömlővéges csatlakozó; Gyorscsatlakozós (SAE); Gyorscsatlakozós (metrikus); Schrader szelep; Oldalsó táplálású injektor adapter; Felső táplálású injektor adapter; Univerzális kúpos adapter; Egyéb
ru: Тип соединения топливной системы: Банджо-фитинг; Штуцер-елочка; Быстросъемное (SAE); Быстросъемное (метрическое); Клапан Шредера; Адаптер форсунки с боковой подачей; Адаптер форсунки с верхней подачей; Универсальный конусный адаптер; Другое
nl: Brandstofsysteem aansluitingstype: Banjofitting; Slangtule; Snelkoppeling (SAE); Snelkoppeling (metrisch); Schrader-ventiel; Side-feed-injectoradapter; Top-feed-injectoradapter; Universele conusadapter; Anders
es: Tipo de conexión del sistema de combustible: Racor de banjo; Espiga de manguera; Conexión rápida (SAE); Conexión rápida (métrica); Válvula Schrader; Adaptador de inyector de alimentación lateral; Adaptador de inyector de alimentación superior; Adaptador cónico universal; Otro
vi: Loại kết nối hệ thống nhiên liệu: Khớp nối Banjo; Đầu đuôi chuột; Kết nối nhanh (SAE); Kết nối nhanh (hệ mét); Van Schrader; Bộ tiếp hợp kim phun cấp nhiên liệu bên; Bộ tiếp hợp kim phun cấp nhiên liệu trên đỉnh; Bộ tiếp hợp hình nón đa năng; Khác
fr: Type de connexion du système de carburant: Raccord banjo; Raccord cannelé; Raccord rapide (SAE); Raccord rapide (métrique); Valve Schrader; Adaptateur d’injecteur à alimentation latérale; Adaptateur d’injecteur à alimentation par le haut; Adaptateur conique universel; Autre
nb: Drivstoffsystemforbindelsestype: Banjokobling; Slangenippel; Hurtigkobling (SAE); Hurtigkobling (metrisk); Schraderventil; Sideinnmatingsadapter for injektor; Toppinnmatingsadapter for injektor; Universell kjegleadapter; Annet
pl: Typ układu paliwowego: Złączka banjo; Króciec na wąż; Szybkozłącze (SAE); Szybkozłącze (metryczne); Zawór Schradera; Adapter wtryskiwacza bocznego (side-feed); Adapter wtryskiwacza górnego (top-feed); Uniwersalny adapter stożkowy; Inne
ko: 연료 시스템 연결 유형: 반조 피팅; 호스 바브; 퀵 커넥트(SAE); 퀵 커넥트(미터식); 슈레이더 밸브; 사이드 피드 인젝터 어댑터; 탑 피드 인젝터 어댑터; 범용 콘 어댑터; 기타
zh-CN: 燃油系统连接类型: 空心螺栓接头; 软管倒刺接头; 快速接头 (SAE); 快速接头（公制）; 美式气门嘴; 侧馈式喷油器适配器; 顶馈式喷油器适配器; 通用锥形适配器; 其他
th: ประเภทการเชื่อมต่อระบบน้ำมันเชื้อเพลิง: ข้อต่อแบนโจ; หางปลาไหล; สวมเร็ว (SAE); สวมเร็ว (เมตริก); วาล์ว Schrader; อะแดปเตอร์หัวฉีดแบบจ่ายข้าง; อะแดปเตอร์หัวฉีดแบบจ่ายบน; อะแดปเตอร์กรวยอเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
de: Typ der Kraftstoffsystemverbindung: Banjo-Anschluss; Schlauchtülle; Schnellkupplung (SAE); Schnellkupplung (metrisch); Schraderventil; Side-Feed-Injektor-Adapter; Top-Feed-Injektor-Adapter; Universeller Kegeladapter; Sonstige
sk-SK: Typ pripojenia palivového systému: Prstencová spojka (banjo); Hadicový tŕň; Rýchlospojka (SAE); Rýchlospojka (metrická); Schraderov ventil; Adaptér vstrekovača s bočným plnením; Adaptér vstrekovača s horným plnením; Univerzálny kužeľový adaptér; Iné
pt-BR: Tipo de conexão do sistema de combustível: Conexão banjo; Espigão para mangueira; Conexão rápida (SAE); Conexão rápida (métrica); Válvula Schrader; Adaptador de injetor de alimentação lateral; Adaptador de injetor de alimentação superior; Adaptador cônico universal; Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta priključka za sustav goriva: Banjo priključak; Priključak za crijevo s kukicom; Brza spojnica (SAE); Brza spojnica (metrička); Schraderov ventil; Adapter za injektor s bočnim dovodom; Adapter za injektor s gornjim dovodom; Univerzalni konusni adapter; Ostalo
cs: Typ palivové soustavy: Šroubení Banjo; Hadicový trn; Rychlospojka (SAE); Rychlospojka (metrická); Schraderův ventilek; Adaptér pro boční plnění vstřikovačů; Adaptér pro horní plnění vstřikovačů; Univerzální kuželový adaptér; Ostatní
bg-BG: Тип връзка на горивната система: Банджо фитинг; Щуцер за маркуч; Бърза връзка (SAE); Бърза връзка (метрична); Вентил на Schrader; Адаптер за инжектор със странично захранване; Адаптер за инжектор с горно захранване; Универсален конусен адаптер; Друго